Nevada, session 83, SB331.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.1323 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388.1323 1. The Office for a Safe and Respectful Learning
Environment is hereby created within the Department.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint a
Director of the Office, who shall serve at the pleasure of the
Superintendent.
3. The Director of the Office shall ensure that the Office:
(a) Maintains a 24-hour, toll-free statewide hotline and Internet
website by which any person can report a violation of the provisions
of NRS 388.121 to 388.1395, inclusive, and obtain information
about antidiscrimination and anti-bullying efforts and organizations;
and
(b) Provides outreach and antidiscrimination and anti-bullying
education and training for pupils, parents and guardians, teachers,
administrators, coaches and other staff members and the members of
a governing body. The outreach and training must include, without
limitation:
(1) Training regarding methods, procedures and practice for
recognizing discrimination based on race, bullying and cyber-
bullying behaviors;
(2) Training regarding effective intervention and remediation
strategies regarding discrimination based on race, bullying and
cyber-bullying;
(3) Training regarding methods for reporting violations of
NRS 388.135; and
(4) Information on and referral to available resources
regarding suicide prevention and the relationship between
discrimination based on race, bullying or cyber-bullying and
suicide, including, without limitation, resources for pupils who are
members of groups at a high risk of suicide. Such groups include,
without limitation, the groups described in subsection 3 of
NRS 388.256.
-
*SB331*

– 3 –
4. The Director of the Office shall establish procedures by
which a person may file a complaint, and the Office may receive
reports and complaints, of discrimination based on race, bullying
and cyber-bullying and complaints regarding violations of the
provisions of NRS 388.121 to 388.1395, inclusive. The Director of
the Office shall post the procedures for filing a complaint on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Director
of the Office or his or her designee shall investigate any complaint
that a teacher, administrator, coach or other staff member or
member of a governing body has violated a provision of NRS
388.121 to 388.1395, inclusive. If a complaint alleges criminal
conduct or an investigation leads the Director of the Office or his or
her designee to suspect criminal conduct, the Director of the Office
may request assistance from the Investigation Division of the
Department of Public Safety. The Director of the Office or his or her
designee is not required to investigate a complaint pursuant to this
subsection if the complaint is made through the SafeVoice Program
established pursuant to NRS 388.1455 and investigated by the team
appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS
388.14553, unless the complaint alleges that a previous
investigation conducted by the team appointed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 388.14553 regarding the same
matter failed to resolve the issue or was otherwise deficient.
Sec. 2. NRS 392.457 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.457 1. The State Board shall, in consultation with the
boards of trustees of school districts, educational personnel, local
associations and organizations of parents whose children are
enrolled in public schools throughout this State and individual
parents and legal guardians whose children are enrolled in public
schools throughout this State, adopt a policy to encourage effective
involvement and engagement by parents and families in support of
their children and the education of their children. The policy
adopted by the State Board must be considered when the Board:
(a) Consults with the boards of trustees of school districts in the
adoption of policies pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Interacts with school districts, public schools, educational
personnel, parents, legal guardians and families of pupils, and
members of the general public in carrying out its duties pursuant to
this title.
2. The policy adopted by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 must include the following elements and goals:
(a) Promotion of an atmosphere for parents and families to visit
the school that their children attend and feel welcome, valued and
-
*SB331*

– 4 –
connected to the staff of the school, other parents and families and
to the education of their children.
(b) Promotion of regular, two-way, meaningful communication
between parents, families and schools relating to learning by pupils.
(c) Collaboration among parents, families and schools to support
learning by pupils and healthy development of pupils at home and
school.
(d) Empowerment of parents and families to advocate for their
children and the children of other parents and families to ensure that
all pupils are treated fairly and have access to learning opportunities
that support pupil achievement.
(e) Promotion of an equal partnership between parents, families
and schools in making decisions that affect children, parents and
families and in informing, influencing and creating school policies,
practices and programs.
(f) Promotion of the involvement of parents and families in
school programs to support pupils, including, without limitation,
programs to support pupils with disabilities, pupils who are
economically disadvantaged and pupils from historically
underserved communities.
(g) Collaboration of parents, families and schools with the
community to connect pupils, parents, families and schools with
learning opportunities, community services and civic participation.
3. The board of trustees of each school district shall, in
consultation with the State Board, educational personnel, local
associations and organizations of parents whose children are
enrolled in public schools of the school district and individual
parents and legal guardians whose children are enrolled in public
schools of the school district, adopt policies to encourage effective
involvement and engagement by parents and families in support of
their children and the education of their children. The policies
adopted pursuant to this subsection must:
(a) Be consistent, to the extent applicable, with the policy
adopted by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Include the elements and goals specified in subsection 2; and
(c) Comply with the parental involvement policy required by the
federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, as set forth in 20
U.S.C. § 6318.
4. The State Board and the board of trustees of each school
district shall, at least once each year, review and amend their
respective policies as necessary.
Sec. 3. NRS 392.4644 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.4644 1. The superintendent of each school district and
the administrative head of each charter school and university school
for profoundly gifted pupils shall establish a plan to provide for the
-
*SB331*

– 5 –
progressive discipline of pupils and on-site review of disciplinary
decisions. The plan must:
(a) Be developed with the input and participation of teachers,
school administrators, school counselors, school social workers,
school psychologists, behavior analysts and other educational
personnel and support personnel who are employed at the public
school, pupils who are enrolled in the public school or schools
within the school district, as applicable, and the parents and
guardians of pupils who are enrolled in the public school or schools
within the school district, as applicable.
(b) Be consistent with the written rules of behavior prescribed in
accordance with NRS 392.463.
(c) Include, without limitation, provisions designed to address
the specific disciplinary needs and concerns of the public school or
each school within the school district, as applicable.
(d) Establish a system to rate offenses by pupils on a
progressive scale of seriousness for purposes of imposing
discipline. The system must include, without limitation, threshold
levels of accumulated offenses that, when met, require school
administrators, in coordination with an organizational team
established pursuant to NRS 388G.700, if applicable, to take
intervening actions to prevent the commission of additional
offenses.
(e) Prescribe methods of alternative conflict resolution and
interventions based on social and emotional learning that are
developed to avoid the need for the removal of a pupil.
[(e)] (f) Include provisions that authorize the temporary
removal of a pupil from a classroom or other premises of a public
school pursuant to NRS 392.4645.
[(f)] (g) Provide for the placement of a pupil in a more
restrictive educational environment at that school or at a different
public school or school within the school district, as applicable, in
accordance with NRS 392.466.
[(g)] (h) Include the names of any members of a committee to
review the temporary alternative placement of pupils required by
NRS 392.4647.
[(h)] (i) Include consideration of the results of the data collected
and reported pursuant to NRS 392.462 and include methods for
addressing the occurrences of the suspension, expulsion or removal
of pupils from school that disproportionately affect pupils who
belong to a group of pupils listed in subsection 2 of NRS 385A.250.
[(i)] (j) Be provided to each school over which the
superintendent or administrative head has authority and posted on
the Internet website maintained by the public school.
-
*SB331*

– 6 –
[(j)] (k) Be in accordance with a plan to use disciplinary
practices based on restorative justice developed pursuant to
subsection 2, if applicable.
2. The superintendent of a school district shall, in addition to
establishing a plan to provide for the progressive discipline of pupils
pursuant to subsection 1, establish a plan to use disciplinary
practices based on restorative justice. Such a plan must:
(a) Authorize the use of disciplinary practices based on
restorative justice which include, without limitation:
(1) Holding a pupil accountable for his or her behavior;
(2) Restoration or remedies related to the behavior of the
pupil;
(3) Relief for any victim of the pupil; and
(4) Changing the behavior of the pupil; and
(b) Be in accordance with the statewide framework for
restorative justice developed pursuant to NRS 388.1333, including,
without limitation, by addressing the occurrences of the suspension,
expulsion or removal of pupils from schools that disproportionately
affect pupils who belong to a group of pupils listed in subsection 2
of NRS 385A.250.
3. On or before September 15 of each year, the principal of
each public school shall:
(a) Review the plan established by subsection 1 in consultation
with the teachers, school administrators, school counselors, school
social workers, school psychologists, behavior analysts and other
educational personnel and support personnel who are employed at
the school, the parents and guardians of pupils, the pupils who are
enrolled in the school and, if applicable, the organizational team
established pursuant to NRS 388G.700;
(b) Determine whether and to what extent the occurrences of the
suspension, expulsion or removal of pupils from school
disproportionately affect pupils who belong to a group of pupils
listed in subsection 2 of NRS 385A.250; and
(c) Based upon the review, recommend to the superintendent of
the school district or the administrative head of the charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable,
revisions to the plan, as recommended by the teachers, school
administrators, school counselors, school social workers, school
psychologists, behavior analysts and other educational personnel
and support personnel, the parents and guardians of pupils, the
pupils who are enrolled in the school and, if applicable, the
organizational team established pursuant to NRS 388G.700, if
necessary.
4. On or before September 30 of each year, the superintendent
of each school district and the administrative head of each charter
-
*SB331*

– 7 –
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils shall issue a
revised plan that appropriately reflects comments provided by
teachers, school administrators, school counselors, school social
workers, school psychologists, behavior analysts, other educational
personnel and support personnel, the parents and guardians of
pupils, the pupils who are enrolled in the school and, if applicable,
organizational teams established pursuant to NRS 388G.700.
5. Not more than 14 days after the receipt of a plan established
pursuant to subsection 1 or a revised plan issued pursuant to
subsection 4, the principal of each school shall:
(a) Post a copy of the plan or the revised plan on the Internet
website maintained by the school; and
(b) Distribute to each teacher, school administrator, school
counselor, school social worker, school psychologist, behavior
analyst and all educational support personnel who are employed at
or assigned to the school and, if applicable, the organizational team
a written or electronic copy of the plan or the revised plan.
6. On or before November 15 of each year, the board of
trustees of each school district and the governing body of each
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
shall:
(a) Submit a written report to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction that reports the progress of each school over which the
board of trustees or governing body has authority in complying with
the requirements of this section, including, without limitation,
addressing the occurrences of the suspension, expulsion or removal
of pupils from school that disproportionately affect pupils who
belong to a group of pupils listed in subsection 2 of NRS 385A.250;
and
(b) Post a copy of the report on the Internet website maintained
by the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable.
7. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that
the data collected pursuant to NRS 392.462 indicates
disproportionality in disciplinary actions or is insufficient to
determine whether disproportionality exists, the Superintendent
shall issue a written notice to the school district, charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, listing
the specific areas of concern and providing a specific corrective
period for the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, to implement a framework
to reduce the disproportionality or correct the insufficiency of the
data, as applicable. The specific corrective period must be at least 12
months but not more than 36 months, and must include required
monitoring of the progress made by the school district, charter
-
*SB331*

– 8 –
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as
applicable. If, after the conclusion of the specific corrective period,
the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, fails to:
(a) Make measurable progress in addressing the
disproportionality or insufficiency listed in the notice issued
pursuant to this subsection; or
(b) Provide the required progress reports,
 the Superintendent may issue an alternative plan for the school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils, as applicable, for mandatory implementation.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 641D.030.
(b) “Restorative justice” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 392.472.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any preparatory administrative tasks that
are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB331*